Washington statutes.
RCW 35.92.050

Authority to acquire and operate utilities.

(1) A city or town may also construct, condemn and purchase, purchase, acquire, add to, alter, maintain, and operate works, plants, facilities for the purpose of furnishing the city or town and its inhabitants, and any other persons, with gas, electricity, green electrolytic hydrogen as defined in RCW 54.04.190, renewable hydrogen as defined in RCW 54.04.190, and other means of power and facilities for lighting, including streetlights as an integral utility service incorporated within general rates, heating, fuel, and power purposes, public and private, with full authority to regulate and control the use, distribution, and price thereof, together with the right to handle and sell or lease, any meters, lamps, motors, transformers, and equipment or accessories of any kind, necessary and convenient for the use, distribution, and sale thereof; authorize the construction of such plant or plants by others for the same purpose, and purchase gas, electricity, or power from either within or without the city or town for its own use and for the purpose of selling to its inhabitants and to other persons doing business within the city or town and regulate and control the use and price thereof.

(2) A city or town that furnishes natural gas shall provide natural gas to those inhabitants that demand, apply for, and are reasonably entitled to receive, natural gas under this section, even if other energy services or energy sources may be available.

[ 2025 c 1 s 3 (Initiative Measure No. 2066, approved November 5, 2024); 2022 c 292 s 405; 2002 c 102 s 3; 1985 c 445 s 9; 1965 c 7 s 35.92.050. Prior: 1957 c 288 s 6; 1957 c 209 s 6; prior: 1947 c 214 s 1, part; 1933 c 163 s 1, part; 1931 c 53 s 1, part; 1923 c 173 s 1, part; 1913 c 45 s 1, part; 1909 c 150 s 1, part; 1899 c 128 s 1, part; 1897 c 112 s 1, part; 1893 c 8 s 1, part; 1890 p 520 s 1, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 9488, part. Formerly RCW 80.40.050.]

NOTES:

Findings—2025 c 1 (Initiative Measure No. 2066): See note following RCW 80.28.110.

Findings—Intent—2022 c 292: See note following RCW 43.330.565.

Purpose—Findings—Severability—2002 c 102: See notes following RCW 35.92.010.